Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.200

Minimum pension.

All retirees and survivors receiving a pension under the provisions of this chapter shall from and after April 25, 1973 receive a minimum pension of three hundred dollars per month.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 181 s 2.]